Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,114
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers from the Legislature and all fees, gifts, grants, and other money, excluding civil penalties, received or collected by the commission under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.

(2) The commission shall use the fund for the administration and enforcement of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.

(3) Any money in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 7.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.